Hawaii statutes.
[§704-410.5] Conditional release; duration
limited in nonfelony cases. For any defendant granted conditional release
in a nonfelony case pursuant to section 704-411(1)(b), 704-412, 704-414, or
704-415, the period of conditional release shall not exceed one year. [L 2016,
c 231, pt of §3]

COMMENTARY ON §704-410.5

Act 231, Session Laws 2016, added this section to implement
recommendations made by the Penal Code Review Committee convened pursuant to
House Concurrent Resolution No. 155, S.D. 1 (2015).

Previous
Vol14_Ch0701-0853
Next